Nevada, session 83, AB472.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A school district in this State that employs, or
intends to employ, a J-1 visa holder pursuant to a teacher
exchange program shall not enter into a contract or partner with
any person or entity that is a sponsor of such a program or that
recruits candidates for such a program if the total amount of fees
and costs charged per person who participates in, or applies to be
a candidate for, the program exceeds $10,000.
2. As used in this section, “J-1 visa holder” means a person
who holds a visa issued pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(J).
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 4. The provisions of section 2 of this act do not apply to a
contract or partnership existing on July 1, 2025, but do apply to any
renewal or extension of such a contract.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)